Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.11
Department or agency; acquire information in court or department records; disclosure requirements.

After being contacted by an adopted person as provided in section 43-146.10, the department or agency, as the case may be, shall verify that no unrevoked nonconsent form is on file with the department. If an unrevoked nonconsent form is not on file, the department or agency, as the case may be, shall apply to the clerk of the court which issued the adoption decree or the department for any information in the court or department records regarding the adopted person or his or her relatives, including names, locations, and any birth, marriage, divorce, or death certificates. Any information which is available shall be given by the court or department only to the department or agency. The department or agency shall keep such information confidential.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 16;

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 52;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 100.